Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.290

Personnel subject to chapter 47.64 RCW not affected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as changing the provisions of or affecting the conditions of employment for personnel covered by chapter 47.64 RCW.

[ 1961 c 1 s 29 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]